Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,129
Sale of real estate; election; notice; form; contents.

Notice of such election shall be given by posting notice in three public places in each of the election precincts in the election district for at least twenty days and also by publication of such notice in a legal newspaper published or of general circulation in the county where the office of the board of directors is kept, once each week for three consecutive weeks. Such notice shall specify the time and place of holding the election in such district and shall contain a brief summary of the proposition involving the proposed conveyance.

Laws 1921, c. 257, § 2, p. 870;

C.S.1922, § 2934;

C.S.1929, § 46-192;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,129;

Laws 1986, LB 960, § 31.